Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.460

Savings incentive account—Report.

(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures from the account.

(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees. Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state, such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.

(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations for:

(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program. "Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third parties or other entities;

(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;

(c) Except for fiscal year 2011, a specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or limitation;

(d) Debt service on state obligations; and

(e) State retirement system obligations.

(4) The office of financial management, after consulting with the legislative fiscal committees, shall report the amount of savings incentives achieved.

(5) For fiscal year 2010, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2009. For fiscal year 2011, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2010. For fiscal year 2011, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund eight million dollars or as much as reflects the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent agency credits prior to fiscal year 2009. Credits for legislative and judicial agencies are not included in this action, with the exception and upon consent of the supreme court, court of appeals, office of public defense, and office of civil legal aid.

(6) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent general fund appropriations for fiscal years 2011 and 2012.

(7) For fiscal year 2016, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent agency credit. Credits for legislative and judicial agencies are not included in this action.

(8) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the joint legislative audit and review committee and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee may use moneys deposited in their subaccounts for one-time costs related to their office relocation to the 1063 building.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 971; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 932; 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 908; 2011 c 5 s 909; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 928; 2009 c 518 s 21; 2009 c 4 s 902; 1998 c 302 s 1; 1997 c 261 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28B.50.837.

Effective date—2011 c 5: See note following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Effective date—2009 c 4: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [February 18, 2009]." [ 2009 c 4 s 911.]

Effective date—1997 c 261: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 6, 1997]." [ 1997 c 261 s 3.]